nb: Sertifiseringsstandard for beskyttelsesutstyr: CE EN 1621-1 (lembeskytter); CE EN 1621-2 (rygg); CE EN 1621-3 (bryst); CE EN 1621-4 (oppblåsbare beskyttere); CE EN 1938 (briller); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Ikke sertifisert; SFI 3.2A (dresser); SFI 3.3 (hansker/sko); SFI 31.1 (hjelmer); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Annet
sl-SI: Standard certifikacije zaščitne opreme: CE EN 1621-1 (udarec na okončinah); CE EN 1621-2 (hrbet); CE EN 1621-3 (prsi); CE EN 1621-4 (napihljivi ščitniki); CE EN 1938 (očala); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Ni certificirano; SFI 3.2A (kombinezoni); SFI 3.3 (rokavice/čevlji); SFI 31.1 (čelade); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Drugo
bg-BG: Стандарт за сертификация на защитна екипировка: CE EN 1621-1 (удар на крайник); CE EN 1621-2 (гръб); CE EN 1621-3 (гърди); CE EN 1621-4 (надуваеми протектори); CE EN 1938 (очила); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Несертифицирано; SFI 3.2A (костюми); SFI 3.3 (ръкавици/обувки); SFI 31.1 (каски); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Друго
hr-HR: Standard certifikacije zaštitne opreme: CE EN 1621-1 (udarci u udove); CE EN 1621-2 (leđa); CE EN 1621-3 (prsa); CE EN 1621-4 (štitnici na napuhavanje); CE EN 1938 (zaštitne naočale); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Bez certifikata; SFI 3.2A (odijela); SFI 3.3 (rukavice/cipele); SFI 31.1 (kacige); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Ostalo
nl: Beschermende uitrusting certificeringsnorm: CE EN 1621-1 (impact op ledematen); CE EN 1621-2 (rug); CE EN 1621-3 (borst); CE EN 1621-4 (opblaasbare beschermers); CE EN 1938 (brillen); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Niet gecertificeerd; SFI 3.2A (pakken); SFI 3.3 (handschoenen/schoenen); SFI 31.1 (helmen); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Anders
pt-PT: Norma de certificação do equipamento de proteção: CE EN 1621-1 (impacto nos membros); CE EN 1621-2 (costas); CE EN 1621-3 (peito); CE EN 1621-4 (protetores insufláveis); CE EN 1938 (óculos de proteção); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Não certificado; SFI 3.2A (fatos); SFI 3.3 (luvas/calçado); SFI 31.1 (capacetes); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Outra
lt-LT: Apsauginės įrangos sertifikavimo standartas: CE EN 1621-1 (galūnių smūgiai); CE EN 1621-2 (nugara); CE EN 1621-3 (krūtinė); CE EN 1621-4 (pripučiamos apsaugos); CE EN 1938 (apsauginiai akiniai); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Nesertifikuota; SFI 3.2A (kostiumai); SFI 3.3 (pirštinės / batai); SFI 31.1 (šalmai); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Kita
pl: Standard certyfikacji sprzętu ochronnego: CE EN 1621-1 (uderzenia w kończyny); CE EN 1621-2 (plecy); CE EN 1621-3 (klatka piersiowa); CE EN 1621-4 (ochraniacze nadmuchiwane); CE EN 1938 (gogle); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Brak certyfikatu; SFI 3.2A (kombinezony); SFI 3.3 (rękawice/buty); SFI 31.1 (kaski); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Inne
da: Certificeringsstandard for beskyttelsesudstyr: CE EN 1621-1 (slag mod lemmer); CE EN 1621-2 (ryg); CE EN 1621-3 (bryst); CE EN 1621-4 (oppustelige beskyttere); CE EN 1938 (beskyttelsesbriller); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Ikke certificeret; SFI 3.2A (dragter); SFI 3.3 (handsker/sko); SFI 31.1 (hjelme); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Anden
sk-SK: Certifikačná norma ochranného výstroja: CE EN 1621-1 (náraz končatín); CE EN 1621-2 (chrbát); CE EN 1621-3 (hrudník); CE EN 1621-4 (nafukovacie chrániče); CE EN 1938 (okuliare); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Bez certifikácie; SFI 3.2A (kombinézy); SFI 3.3 (rukavice/obuv); SFI 31.1 (prilby); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Iné
el: Πρότυπο πιστοποίησης προστατευτικού εξοπλισμού: CE EN 1621-1 (κρούση άκρων); CE EN 1621-2 (πλάτη); CE EN 1621-3 (στήθος); CE EN 1621-4 (φουσκωτά προστατευτικά); CE EN 1938 (γυαλιά); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Μη πιστοποιημένο; SFI 3.2A (στολές); SFI 3.3 (γάντια/παπούτσια); SFI 31.1 (κράνη); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Άλλο
it: Standard di certificazione dei dispositivi di protezione: CE EN 1621-1 (impatto sugli arti); CE EN 1621-2 (schiena); CE EN 1621-3 (torace); CE EN 1621-4 (protezioni gonfiabili); CE EN 1938 (occhiali); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Non certificato; SFI 3.2A (tute); SFI 3.3 (guanti/scarpe); SFI 31.1 (caschi); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Altro
th: มาตรฐานการรับรองอุปกรณ์ป้องกัน: CE EN 1621-1 (การกระแทกแขนขา); CE EN 1621-2 (แผ่นหลัง); CE EN 1621-3 (หน้าอก); CE EN 1621-4 (อุปกรณ์ป้องกันแบบพองลม); CE EN 1938 (แว่นตานิรภัย); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; ไม่ผ่านการรับรอง; SFI 3.2A (ชุดแข่ง); SFI 3.3 (ถุงมือ/รองเท้า); SFI 31.1 (หมวกกันน็อก); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; อื่นๆ
ru: Стандарт сертификации защитного снаряжения: CE EN 1621-1 (защита конечностей); CE EN 1621-2 (защита спины); CE EN 1621-3 (защита груди); CE EN 1621-4 (надувная защита); CE EN 1938 (защитные очки); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Не сертифицировано; SFI 3.2A (костюмы); SFI 3.3 (перчатки / обувь); SFI 31.1 (шлемы); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Другое
tr: Koruyucu ekipman sertifikasyon standardı: CE EN 1621-1 (uzuv darbesi); CE EN 1621-2 (sırt); CE EN 1621-3 (göğüs); CE EN 1621-4 (şişirilebilir koruyucular); CE EN 1938 (gözlükler); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Sertifikasız; SFI 3.2A (tulumlar); SFI 3.3 (eldivenler/ayakkabılar); SFI 31.1 (kasklar); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Diğer
ko: 보호 장비 인증 표준: CE EN 1621-1(사지 충격); CE EN 1621-2(등); CE EN 1621-3(가슴); CE EN 1621-4(팽창식 보호대); CE EN 1938(고글); DOT(FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; 인증되지 않음; SFI 3.2A(슈트); SFI 3.3(장갑/신발); SFI 31.1(헬멧); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; 기타
vi: Tiêu chuẩn chứng nhận trang thiết bị bảo hộ: CE EN 1621-1 (va đập chi); CE EN 1621-2 (lưng); CE EN 1621-3 (ngực); CE EN 1621-4 (bảo vệ bơm hơi); CE EN 1938 (kính bảo hộ); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Không có chứng nhận; SFI 3.2A (quần áo); SFI 3.3 (găng tay/giày); SFI 31.1 (mũ bảo hiểm); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Khác
ro-RO: Standardul de certificare a echipamentului de protecție: CE EN 1621-1 (impact la nivelul membrelor); CE EN 1621-2 (spate); CE EN 1621-3 (piept); CE EN 1621-4 (protecții gonflabile); CE EN 1938 (ochelari de protecție); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Necertificat; SFI 3.2A (costume); SFI 3.3 (mănuși/încălțăminte); SFI 31.1 (căști); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Altele
fi: Suojavarusteiden sertifiointistandardi: CE EN 1621-1 (raajaiskut); CE EN 1621-2 (selkä); CE EN 1621-3 (rinta); CE EN 1621-4 (ilmatäytteiset suojat); CE EN 1938 (suojalasit); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Ei sertifioitu; SFI 3.2A (puvut); SFI 3.3 (käsineet/kengät); SFI 31.1 (kypärät); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Muu
es: Estándar de certificación de equipos de protección: CE EN 1621-1 (impacto en extremidades); CE EN 1621-2 (espalda); CE EN 1621-3 (pecho); CE EN 1621-4 (protectores inflables); CE EN 1938 (gafas); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; No certificado; SFI 3.2A (trajes); SFI 3.3 (guantes/zapatos); SFI 31.1 (cascos); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Otro
pt-BR: Equipamento de proteção norma de certificação: CE EN 1621-1 (impacto de membros); CE EN 1621-2 (costas); CE EN 1621-3 (peito); CE EN 1621-4 (protetores infláveis); CE EN 1938 (óculos de proteção); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Não certificado; SFI 3.2A (macacões); SFI 3.3 (luvas/sapatos); SFI 31.1 (capacetes); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Outra
sv: Standard för certifiering av skyddsutrustning: CE EN 1621-1 (stötskydd för extremiteter); CE EN 1621-2 (rygg); CE EN 1621-3 (bröst); CE EN 1621-4 (uppblåsbara skydd); CE EN 1938 (skyddsglasögon); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Ej certifierad; SFI 3.2A (dräkter); SFI 3.3 (handskar/skor); SFI 31.1 (hjälmar); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Övrigt
hu: Védőfelszerelés tanúsítási szabványa: CE EN 1621-1 (végtagütődés); CE EN 1621-2 (hát); CE EN 1621-3 (mellkas); CE EN 1621-4 (felfújható védőfelszerelések); CE EN 1938 (védőszemüvegek); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Nem minősített; SFI 3.2A (ruhák); SFI 3.3 (kesztyűk / cipők); SFI 31.1 (sisakok); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Egyéb
zh-TW: 防護裝備認證標準: CE EN 1621-1 (四肢衝擊); CE EN 1621-2 (背部); CE EN 1621-3 (胸部); CE EN 1621-4 (充氣護具); CE EN 1938 (護目鏡); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; 未經認證; SFI 3.2A (賽車服); SFI 3.3 (手套/鞋子); SFI 31.1 (頭盔); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; 其他
zh-CN: 防护装备认证标准: CE EN 1621-1（肢体冲击）; CE EN 1621-2（背部）; CE EN 1621-3（胸部）; CE EN 1621-4（充气护具）; CE EN 1938（护目镜）; DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; 未认证; SFI 3.2A（赛车服）; SFI 3.3（手套/鞋）; SFI 31.1（头盔）; Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; 其他
de: Zertifizierungsstandard für Schutzausrüstung: CE EN 1621-1 (Gliedmaßenaufprall); CE EN 1621-2 (Rücken); CE EN 1621-3 (Brust); CE EN 1621-4 (aufblasbare Protektoren); CE EN 1938 (Schutzbrillen); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Nicht zertifiziert; SFI 3.2A (Anzüge); SFI 3.3 (Handschuhe / Schuhe); SFI 31.1 (Helme); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Sonstige
fr: Norme de certification de l’équipement de protection: CE EN 1621-1 (impact sur les membres); CE EN 1621-2 (dos); CE EN 1621-3 (poitrine); CE EN 1621-4 (protections gonflables); CE EN 1938 (lunettes de protection); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Non certifié; SFI 3.2A (combinaisons); SFI 3.3 (gants/chaussures); SFI 31.1 (casques); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Autre
cs: Norma pro certifikaci ochranných pomůcek: CE EN 1621-1 (náraz na končetiny); CE EN 1621-2 (záda); CE EN 1621-3 (hrudník); CE EN 1621-4 (nafukovací chrániče); CE EN 1938 (brýle); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Bez certifikace; SFI 3.2A (obleky); SFI 3.3 (rukavice/boty); SFI 31.1 (helmy); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Ostatní
ja: 保護具認証基準: CE EN 1621-1 (四肢の衝撃); CE EN 1621-2 (背中); CE EN 1621-3 (胸部); CE EN 1621-4 (膨張式プロテクター); CE EN 1938 (ゴーグル); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; 認証なし; SFI 3.2A (スーツ); SFI 3.3 (グローブ/シューズ); SFI 31.1 (ヘルメット); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; その他
en: Protective gear certification standard: CE EN 1621-1 (limb impact); CE EN 1621-2 (back); CE EN 1621-3 (chest); CE EN 1621-4 (inflatable protectors); CE EN 1938 (goggles); DOT (FMVSS 218); ECE 22.05; ECE 22.06; FIA 8856-2018; FIA 8859-2015; FIA 8870-2018; Not certified; SFI 3.2A (suits); SFI 3.3 (gloves/shoes); SFI 31.1 (helmets); Snell M2020; Snell SA2020; Snell SA2025; Other